Utah statutes.
63M-4-201.   Governor's energy advisor -- Duties.

(1) (a)  The governor shall appoint an energy advisor.

(b)  The governor's energy advisor serves at the pleasure of the governor.

(2)  The governor's energy advisor shall:

(a)  advise the governor on energy-related matters;

(b)  annually review and propose updates to the state's energy policy, as contained in Section 63M-4-301;

(c)  promote as the governor's energy advisor considers necessary:

(i)  the development of cost-effective energy resources both renewable and nonrenewable; and

(ii)  educational programs, including programs supporting conservation and energy efficiency measures;

(d)  coordinate across state agencies to assure consistency with state energy policy, including:

(i)  working with the State Energy Program to promote access to federal assistance for energy-related projects for state agencies and members of the public;

(ii)  working with the Division of Emergency Management to assist the governor in carrying out the governor's energy emergency powers under Title 63K, Chapter 2, Energy Emergency Powers of the Governor Act;

(iii)  participating in the annual review of the energy emergency plan and the maintenance of the energy emergency plan and a current list of contact persons required by Section 53-2-110; and

(iv)  identifying and proposing measures necessary to facilitate low-income consumers' access to energy services;

(e)  coordinate with the Division of Emergency Management ongoing activities designed to test an energy emergency plan to ensure coordination and information sharing among state agencies and political subdivisions in the state, public utilities and other energy suppliers, and other relevant public sector persons as required by Sections 53-2-110, 63K-2-201, 63K-2-205, and 63K-2-301;

(f)  coordinate with requisite state agencies to study:

(i)  the creation of a centralized state repository for energy-related information;

(ii)  methods for streamlining state review and approval processes for energy-related projects; and

(iii)  the development of multistate energy transmission and transportation  infrastructure;

(g)  coordinate energy-related regulatory processes within the state;

(h)  compile, and make available to the public, information about federal, state, and local approval requirements for energy-related projects;

(i)  act as the state's advocate before federal and local authorities for energy-related infrastructure projects or coordinate with the appropriate state agency; and

(j)  help promote the Division of Facilities Construction and Management's measures to improve energy efficiency in state buildings.

(3)  The governor's energy advisor has standing to testify on behalf of the governor at the Public Service Commission created in Section 54-1-1.

